District of Columbia statutes.
32-1407

Definition of apprentice.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term “apprentice” means a worker at least 16 years of age, except when a higher minimum age standard is otherwise fixed by law, who is employed to learn an apprenticeable occupation meeting the criteria approved by the Registration Agency and who has entered into a written apprenticeship agreement, which contains the terms and conditions of the employment and training of the apprentice, with either the apprentice’s program sponsor or an apprenticeship committee acting as agent for the program sponsor.

History

May 21, 1946, 60 Stat. 205, ch. 267, § 7
Mar. 6, 1979, D.C. Law 2-156, § 4, 25 DCR 6991
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 2012(g), 62 DCR 10905

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 36-408.
1973 Ed., § 36-127.

Effect of Amendments

The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 rewrote the section.

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(g) of the Apprenticeship Modernization Temporary Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Law 20-256, Apr. 30, 2015, 62 DCR 2259).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(g) of the Apprenticeship Modernization Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-579, Jan. 13, 2015, 62 DCR 1258, 21 STAT 724).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(g) of the Apprenticeship Modernization Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-16, Mar. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 3847, 21 DCSTAT 843).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2012(g) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).